Washington statutes.
RCW 7.77.060

Emergency order.

During a collaborative law process, a tribunal may issue emergency orders to protect the health, safety, welfare, or interest of a party or of a family or household member or intimate partner, as defined in RCW 7.105.010.

[ 2021 c 215 s 91; 2020 c 29 s 1; 2013 c 119 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.

Effective date—2020 c 29: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [March 18, 2020]." [ 2020 c 29 s 19.]